Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1612
Hearing; procedure.

(1) A hearing before a child support referee shall be conducted in the same manner as a hearing before the district court, separate juvenile court, or county court. A child support referee shall have the power to summon and enforce the attendance of parties and witnesses, administer all necessary oaths, supervise pretrial preparation pursuant to the rules of discovery adopted pursuant to section 25-1273.01, grant continuations and adjournments, recommend the appointment of counsel for indigent parties, and carry out any other duties permitted by law and assigned by the district court, separate juvenile court, or county court.

(2) Testimony in matters heard by a child support referee shall be preserved by tape recording or other prescribed measures and in accordance with prescribed standards. Transcripts of all hearings shall be available upon request and all costs of preparing the transcript shall be paid by the party for whom it is prepared.

(3) A child support referee shall, in all cases, announce orally his or her findings and recommendations to the parties or their attorneys and submit a written report to the district court, separate juvenile court, or county court containing findings of fact and recommendations and any and all exceptions.

Laws 1989, LB 265, § 5;

Laws 2008, LB1014, § 52.